tests/yotised-prc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Participle":
    сюй<v><tv><prc_perf> : сююп
    къой<v><tv><prc_perf> : къоюп
    жый<v><tv><prc_perf> : жыйып

  "[twol] Aorist":
    сюй<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : сюемен
    сюй<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : сюе
    къой<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : къояман
    къой<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : къоя

  "[twol] px3sp":
    кюй<n><px3sp><nom> : кюю
    кюй<n><px3sp><loc> : кююнде
    кюй<n><px3sp><gen> : кююню
    уьй<n><px3sp><nom> : уью
    уьй<n><px3sp><dat> : уьюне
    уьй<n><px3sp><loc> : уьюнде
    сююв<n><px3sp><nom> : сюювю
    сююв<n><px3sp><dat> : сюювюне
    сююв<n><px3sp><gen> : сюювюню
    сююв<n><px3sp><loc> : сюювюнде


  "[twol] ъ/0 forms":
    кюй<n><dat> : кюйге
    уьй<n><dat> : уьйге
    сююв<n><dat> : сюювге
